dev/ortho/cyr-ipa.twol
Alphabet 

 А:ɑ А:ː А:a
 Б:p
 В:w
 Г:k Г:q Г:ʁ
 Д:t
 Ж:ʧ
 З:ʦ
 И:i
 Й:i Й:e Й:ː
 К:k
 Л:ɮ
 М:m
 Н:n Н:ŋ
 О:ɔ О:ː О:ɶ
 Ө:o Ө:ː
 П:p
 Р:ɾ
 С:s
 Т:t
 У:ʊ У:ː
 Ү:u Ү:ː
 Ф:f
 Х:x
 Ч:ʧ
 Ц:ʦ
 Ш:ʃ
 Ь:ʲ
 Ы:i
 Ъ:0
 Э:e Э:ː
 Я:ɑ
 Е:e
 Ё:o Ё:ɔ
 Ю:u

 а:ɑ а:ː а:a
 б:p
 в:w
 г:k г:q г:ʁ
 д:t
 ж:ʧ
 з:ʦ
 и:i
 й:i й:e й:ː
 к:k
 л:ɮ
 м:m
 н:n н:ŋ
 о:ɔ о:ː о:ɶ
 ө:o ө:ː
 п:p
 р:ɾ
 с:s
 т:t
 у:ʊ у:ː
 ү:u ү:ː
 ф:f
 х:x
 ч:ʧ
 ц:ʦ
 ш:ʃ
 ь:ʲ
 ы:i
 ъ:0
 э:e э:ː
 я:ɑ
 е:e
 ё:o ё:ɔ
 ю:u


 %{j%}:j
 %{ʰ%}:ʰ

 %{ʲ%}:ʲ %{ʲ%}:0

 %{ˈ%}:0    ! no stress for now
! %{ˈ%}:ˈ
 
 ;


Sets 

Vow = и ү е э ө а о у ы 
      И Ү Е Э Ө А О У Ы ;

IPAVow = ɑ e i ɔ o ʊ u ;

backVow = а о у
          А О У ;

lowVow = а о э ө
         А О Э Ө ;

Jot = ё я ю
      Ё Я Ю ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ я е ё
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Я Е Ё ;

IPACons = p w k ɣ ʁ q t ʧ ʦ j ɮ m n ŋ ɾ s f x ʃ ʰ ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

Nasal = Н М
        н м ;


Rules 

"long vowel only after identical vowel in first syllable"
VowY:ː <=> .#. [ :IPACons* VowX: ]/[ :0 - Vow: ]* _ ;
       except
           _ й:/:0* ;
       where
           VowX in ( а э о ө и ү у я ё ю )
           VowY in ( а э о ө й ү у а о у )
       matched ;

"let's give non-σ1 long у|ү a half length mark, since there can be short ones there too that aren't really reduced to ə"
VowY:ˑ <=> VowX:/[ %{ˈ%}: ]* _ ;
       except
           .#. [ :IPACons* Vow: ]/[ :0 ]* _ ;
       where
           VowX in ( ү у )
           VowY in ( ү у )
       matched ;

"no long vowels except in first syllable"
VowY:0 <=> VowX:/[ %{ˈ%}: ]* _ ;
       except
           .#. [ :IPACons* Vow: ]/[ :0 ]* _ ;
           _ й:/:0* ;
       where
           VowX in ( а э о ө ) ! ү у )
           VowY in ( а э о ө ) ! ү у )
       matched ;

"no long i except in first syllable"
й:0 <=> и:/[ %{ˈ%}: ]* _ ;
    except
        .#. [ :IPACons* и: ]/[ :0 ]* _ ;

"diphthongs second element"
й:VowY <=> :VowX/:0* _ ;
       where
           VowX in ( a ɶ )
           VowY in ( e e )
       matched ;

"diphthongs first element"
VowX:VowY <=> _ й:/:0* ;
          where
              VowX in ( а о )
              VowY in ( a ɶ )
          matched ;

"short vowels in non-initial syllables are ə"
VowX:ə <=> :IPACons/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] _ :IPACons/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] ;
       except
           .#. [ :IPACons/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ]* ]* ( Vow:/[ :0 - Vow: ]* ) _ ;
			  _ %{ˈ%}: й: ;
!           VowX: :* [ :IPACons* :IPACons ]/:0* _ .#. ;
       where
           VowX in ( а э о ө и ) ;

"Single short low vowels at end of words not pronounced"
!lowVow:0 <=> :IPACons _ .#. ;
VowX:0 <=> VowX: :* [ :IPACons* ]/:0* :IPACons/[ %{ˈ%}: ]* _ .#. ;
       where
           VowX in ( о а э ө ) ;

"н is ŋ at end of word and before г"
н:ŋ <=> _ .#. ;
		  _ г:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʲ%}: | %{ʰ%}: ] ;

"no ʲ word-initially or before иV sequence or between vowels"
%{ʲ%}:0 <=> .#. _ ;
            :IPAVow/[ %{ˈ%}: ] _ :IPAVow/[ %{ˈ%}: ] ;
!            _ [ и: :IPAVow ]/:0* ;  ! need to get иа:ɑː first


! The following rules for г probably need some work
"г as q only before back vowels"
г:q <=> _ backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] ;
        backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] _ backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: ] .#. ;
    except
        backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] _ backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: ]  ;

"г as ʁ only between back vowels"
г:ʁ <=> backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] _ backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: ]  ;
    except
        backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: | %{ʰ%}: | %{ʲ%}: ] _ backVow:/[ %{ˈ%}: ] .#. ;
